Illinois, session 104th, SB1783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibition on Government Sponsored Sexual Performances Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Live adult performance" means:8        (1) a live performance in which persons appear in a 9    state of nudity or semi-nudity;10        (2) a live performance that is characterized by actual 11    or simulated acts of sexual penetration or sexual conduct 12    as defined in Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; 13    or14        (3) a live performance that features dancers, exotic 15    dances, strippers, vogue type movements, or male or female 16    impersonators who provide entertainment that appeals to 17    the prurient interest of persons under 18 years of age.18    "Nudity" or "state of nudity" means (i) the showing of the 19human male or female genitals, pubic area, vulva, anus, anal 20cleft or cleavage with less than a fully opaque covering; (ii) 21the showing of the female breast with less than a fully opaque 22covering of any part of the nipple; or (iii) the showing of the 23covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state.   SB1783- 2 -LRB104 12034 RTM 22129 b1    "Semi-nudity" means a state of dress in which opaque 2clothing fails to cover the genitals, anus, anal cleft or 3cleavage, pubic area, vulva, and nipple and areola of the 4female breast below a horizontal line across the top of the 5areola at its highest point. "Semi-nudity" includes the entire 6lower portion of the female breast, but does not include any 7portion of the cleavage of the human female breast exhibited 8by wearing apparel provided the areola is not exposed in whole 9or part.  10    Section 10. Prohibition of live performances containing 11adult content for persons under the age of 18.12    (a) A unit of local government or a school district may not 13allow a live adult performance to be held on publicly owned or 14operated property under its control.15    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State 16must stop distributing all funds to a unit of local government 17or school district that violates this Section. 18    Section 15. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit may not 19regulate live adult performances in a manner inconsistent with 20this Act. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 21Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 22concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 23exercised by the State. 24    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB1783- 3 -LRB104 12034 RTM 22129 b1becoming law.